Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-424 Subscriber's share of assets.
Upon the liquidation of a domestic reciprocal insurer, its assets remaining
after discharge of its indebtedness and policy obligations, the return of any
contributions to its surplus made as provided in section 431:4-422, and the
return of any unused deposits, savings, or credits, shall be distributed to its
subscribers who were such within the twelve months prior to such formula as may
have been approved by the commissioner. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next